Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF5154.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [17.034] OFFICE OF BUSINESS REGULATION AND LAND OWNERSHIP. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin The Office of Business Regulation and Land Ownership is established within the Department of Agriculture. The Office of Business Regulation and Land Ownership has the duties described in subdivision 2. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Duties; reports. new text end new text begin (a) The office must: new text end new text begin (1) examine the establishment of monopolies and consolidation of agriculture-related businesses in the state, including businesses that produce or sell agricultural commodities, seed, and agricultural chemicals; new text end new text begin (2) evaluate purchases of agricultural land and land consolidation across industries in the state by: new text end new text begin (i) individuals; new text end new text begin (ii) limited liability companies; new text end new text begin (iii) corporations; new text end new text begin (iv) churches; and new text end new text begin (v) other nonprofit organizations; new text end new text begin (3) identify trends in agricultural land purchasing and land consolidation across industries in the state; and new text end new text begin (4) provide advice to the commissioner of agriculture. new text end new text begin (b) The office must submit a biennial report with its findings to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over agriculture. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Director; other staff. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of agriculture must appoint a director to manage the Office of Business Regulation and Land Ownership. The director must have knowledge about antitrust law, property law, and agriculture-related businesses. The director serves in the unclassified service. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must hire staff, including lawyers and economists, to perform the duties of the Office of Business Regulation and Land Ownership. The staff are in the unclassified service of the state. Compensation for staff must be established pursuant to chapter 43A. The staff must be reimbursed for the expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of official duties in the same manner as other state employees. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; OFFICE OF BUSINESS REGULATION AND LAND OWNERSHIP.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of agriculture for the purposes of establishing and funding the Office of Business Regulation and Land Ownership within the Department of Agriculture. new text end